Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
481R]

VEHICLE
PROTECTION PRODUCT WARRANTORS

Section

481R-1 Definitions

481R-2 Applicability of chapter

481R-3 Powers and duties of the commissioner

481R-4 Registration requirements; exemptions

481R-5 Financial security requirements

481R-6 Reimbursement insurance policy

481R-7 General warrantor operation requirements

481R-8 Warrantor records

481R-9 Required disclosures

481R-10 Cancellation of warranty

481R-11 Limitations on use of warrantor's name

481R-12 Prohibited acts

481R-13 Enforcement

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next